Illinois, session 104th, HB4427.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 6z-112 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/6z-112)7    Sec. 6z-112. The Cannabis Regulation Fund.8    (a) There is created the Cannabis Regulation Fund in the 9State treasury, subject to appropriations unless otherwise 10provided in this Section. All moneys collected under the 11Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act shall be deposited into the 12Cannabis Regulation Fund, consisting of taxes, license fees, 13other fees, and any other amounts required to be deposited or 14transferred into the Fund.15    (b) Whenever the Department of Revenue determines that a 16refund should be made under the Cannabis Regulation and Tax 17Act to a claimant, the Department of Revenue shall submit a 18voucher for payment to the State Comptroller, who shall cause 19the order to be drawn for the amount specified and to the 20person named in the notification from the Department of 21Revenue. This subsection (b) shall constitute an irrevocable 22and continuing appropriation of all amounts necessary for the 23payment of refunds out of the Fund as authorized under this   HB4427- 2 -LRB104 17729 HLH 31160 b1subsection (b).2    (c) On or before the 25th day of each calendar month, the 3Department of Revenue shall prepare and certify to the State 4Comptroller the transfer and allocations of stated sums of 5money from the Cannabis Regulation Fund to other named funds 6in the State treasury. The amount subject to transfer shall be 7the amount of the taxes, license fees, other fees, and any 8other amounts paid into the Fund during the second preceding 9calendar month, minus the refunds made under subsection (b) 10during the second preceding calendar month by the Department. 11The transfers shall be certified as follows:12        (1) The Department of Revenue shall first determine 13    the allocations which shall remain in the Cannabis 14    Regulation Fund, subject to appropriations, to pay for the 15    direct and indirect costs associated with the 16    implementation, administration, and enforcement of the 17    Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act by the Department of 18    Revenue, the Department of State Police, the Department of 19    Financial and Professional Regulation, the Department of 20    Agriculture, the Department of Public Health, the 21    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, and the 22    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority.23        (2) After the allocations have been made as provided 24    in paragraph (1) of this subsection (c), of the remainder 25    of the amount subject to transfer for the month as 26    determined in this subsection (c), the Department shall   HB4427- 3 -LRB104 17729 HLH 31160 b1    certify the transfer into the Cannabis Expungement Fund 2    1/12 of the fiscal year amount appropriated from the 3    Cannabis Expungement Fund for payment of costs incurred by 4    State courts, the Attorney General, State's Attorneys, 5    civil legal aid, as defined by Section 15 of the Public 6    Interest Attorney Assistance Act, and the Department of 7    State Police to facilitate petitions for expungement of 8    Minor Cannabis Offenses pursuant to Public Act 101-27, as 9    adjusted by any supplemental appropriation, plus 10    cumulative deficiencies in such transfers for prior 11    months.12        (3) After the allocations have been made as provided 13    in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection (c), the 14    Department of Revenue shall certify to the State 15    Comptroller and the State Treasurer shall transfer the 16    amounts that the Department of Revenue determines shall be 17    transferred into the following named funds according to 18    the following:19            (A) 2% shall be transferred to the Drug Treatment 20        Fund to be used by the Department of Human Services 21        for: (i) developing and administering a scientifically 22        and medically accurate public education campaign 23        educating youth and adults about the health and safety 24        risks of alcohol, tobacco, illegal drug use (including 25        prescription drugs), and cannabis, including use by 26        pregnant women; and (ii) data collection and analysis   HB4427- 4 -LRB104 17729 HLH 31160 b1        of the public health impacts of legalizing the 2        recreational use of cannabis. Expenditures for these 3        purposes shall be subject to appropriations.4            (B) 8% shall be transferred to the Local 5        Government Distributive Fund and allocated as provided 6        in Section 2 of the State Revenue Sharing Act. The 7        moneys shall be used to fund crime prevention 8        programs, training, and interdiction efforts, 9        including detection, enforcement, and prevention 10        efforts, relating to the illegal cannabis market and 11        driving under the influence of cannabis.12            (C) 25% shall be transferred to the Criminal 13        Justice Information Projects Fund to be used for the 14        purposes of the Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program 15        to address economic development, violence prevention 16        services, re-entry services, youth development, and 17        civil legal aid, as defined by Section 15 of the Public 18        Interest Attorney Assistance Act. The Restore, 19        Reinvest, and Renew Program shall address these issues 20        through targeted investments and intervention programs 21        and promotion of an employment infrastructure and 22        capacity building related to the social determinants 23        of health in impacted community areas. Expenditures 24        for these purposes shall be subject to appropriations.25            (D) 20% shall be transferred to the Department of 26        Human Services Community Services Fund, to be used to   HB4427- 5 -LRB104 17729 HLH 31160 b1        address substance abuse and prevention and mental 2        health concerns, including treatment, education, and 3        prevention to address the negative impacts of 4        substance abuse and mental health issues, including 5        concentrated poverty, violence, and the historical 6        overuse of criminal justice responses in certain 7        communities, on the individual, family, and community, 8        including federal, State, and local governments, 9        health care institutions and providers, and 10        correctional facilities. Expenditures for these 11        purposes shall be subject to appropriations.12            (E) 10% shall be transferred to the Budget 13        Stabilization Fund.14            (F) 0.5% shall be transferred to the Prison 15        Education Fund, a special fund created in the State 16        treasury. Moneys in the Prison Education Fund shall be 17        used by the Illinois Community College Board and 18        Illinois Board of Higher Education to make grants to 19        prison education programs that award associate degrees 20        or bachelor's degrees to currently incarcerated 21        students. The Illinois Community College Board and the 22        Illinois Board of Higher Education shall distribute 23        moneys received under this paragraph as grants to 24        eligible institutions, informed by regular meetings of 25        relevant agencies, programs, and affected 26        stakeholders, as appropriate. Only private non-profit   HB4427- 6 -LRB104 17729 HLH 31160 b1        and public colleges and universities shall be eligible 2        to apply for grants under this paragraph. The 3        applications from eligible programs shall be evaluated 4        based on: (i) the program's commitment to use funding 5        to stabilize and increase enrollment; (ii) past data 6        on program costs, enrollment, attendance, and 7        outcomes, including, but not limited to, credit 8        completion and graduation; (iii) the program's 9        willingness to collect and report necessary program 10        data; and (iv) the program's willingness to take all 11        possible and prudent steps to receive federal and 12        other sources of funding. Eligible programs shall 13        apply for and receive no more than $2,000 per student 14        enrolled in the program, with excess grant funding 15        returned to the Illinois Community College Board or 16        the Illinois Board of Higher Education, as applicable, 17        for deposit into the Prison Education Fund. 18        Undistributed and returned grant moneys shall be 19        transferred annually from the Prison Education Fund to 20        the General Revenue Fund. 21            (G) 34.5%, (F) 35%, or any remaining balance, 22        shall be transferred to the General Revenue Fund.23    As soon as may be practical, but no later than 10 days 24after receipt, by the State Comptroller of the transfer 25certification provided for in this subsection (c) to be given 26to the State Comptroller by the Department of Revenue, the   HB4427- 7 -LRB104 17729 HLH 31160 b1State Comptroller shall direct and the State Treasurer shall 2transfer the respective amounts in accordance with the 3directions contained in such certification.4    (d) On July 1, 2019 the Department of Revenue shall 5certify to the State Comptroller and the State Treasurer shall 6transfer $5,000,000 from the Compassionate Use of Medical 7Cannabis Fund to the Cannabis Regulation Fund.8    (e) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary and 9except as otherwise provided in this Section, this Fund is not 10subject to sweeps, administrative charge-backs, or any other 11fiscal or budgetary maneuver that would in any way transfer 12any amounts from this Fund into any other fund of the State.13    (f) The Cannabis Regulation Fund shall retain a balance of 14$1,000,000 for the purposes of administrative costs.15    (g) In Fiscal Year 2024 the allocations in subsection (c) 16of this Section shall be reviewed and adjusted if the General 17Assembly finds there is a greater need for funding for a 18specific purpose in the State as it relates to Public Act 19101-27.20(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)